Washington statutes.
RCW 15.60.085

Apiary coordinated areas—Boundary change procedure.

When the county legislative authority of any county deems it advisable to change the boundary or boundaries of any apiary coordinated area, a hearing shall be held in the same manner as provided in RCW 15.60.065. If the county legislative authority decides to change the boundary or boundaries of any apiary coordinated area or areas, they shall within thirty days after the conclusion of such hearing make an order describing the change or changes. Such order shall be entered upon the records of the county and published in a newspaper having general circulation in the county once each week for four successive weeks.

[ 2011 c 103 s 6; 1989 c 354 s 68. Formerly RCW 15.60.210.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.